Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB888.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1102(a) and 3301(b)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1102. Sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer.(a) First degree.--(1) Except as provided under section 1102.1 (relating to sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and murder of a law enforcement officer), a 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 person who has been convicted of a murder of the first degree or of murder of a law enforcement officer of the first degree shall be sentenced to [death or to] a term of life imprisonment in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 9711 (relating to sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree).(2) The sentence for a person who has been convicted of first degree murder of an unborn child shall be the same as the sentence for murder of the first degree.[, except that the death penalty shall not be imposed. This paragraph shall not affect the determination of an aggravating circumstance under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9711(d)(17) for the killing of a pregnant woman.]* * *§ 3301. Arson and related offenses.* * *(b) Sentence.--(1) A person convicted of violating the provisions of subsection (a)(2), murder of the first degree[,] or second degree shall be sentenced to [death or] life imprisonment without right to parole[; a person convicted of murder of the second degree, pursuant to subsection (a)(2), shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without right to parole]. Notwithstanding provisions to the contrary, no language herein shall infringe upon the inherent powers of the Governor to commute said sentence.* * *Section 2. Sections 722(4), 9543.1(a)(6), (c)(2) and (3) and (d)(2), 9577(a) and 9711 of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 722. Direct appeals from courts of common pleas.The Supreme Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction of 20250HB0888PN0960 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appeals from final orders of the courts of common pleas in the following classes of cases:* * *(4) Automatic review of sentences as provided by 42 Pa.C.S. [§§ 9546(d) (relating to relief and order) and 9711(h) (relating to review of death sentence)] § 9546(d) (relating to relief and order).* * *§ 9543.1. Postconviction DNA testing.(a) Motion.--* * *(6) The motion shall explain how, after review of the record of the applicant's trial, there is a reasonable possibility if the applicant is under State supervision, or there is a reasonable probability if the applicant is not under State supervision, or after review of the record of the applicant's guilty plea there is a reasonable probability, that the testing would produce exculpatory evidence that would establish:(i) the applicant's actual innocence of the offense for which the applicant was convicted;[(ii) in a capital case, the applicant's actual innocence of the charged or uncharged conduct constituting an aggravating circumstance under section 9711(d) (relating to sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree) if the applicant's exoneration of the conduct would result in vacating a sentence of death; or(iii) in a capital case, a mitigating circumstance under section 9711(e)(7) under the circumstances set forth in section 9711(c)(1)(iv)].20250HB0888PN0960 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(c) Requirements.--In any motion under subsection (a), under penalty of perjury, the applicant shall:* * *(2) (i) in a sworn statement subject to the penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 4902 (relating to perjury) and 4903 (relating to false swearing), assert the applicant's actual innocence of the offense for which the applicant was convicted and that the applicant seeks DNA testing for the purpose of demonstrating the applicant's actual innocence; and[(ii) in a capital case:(A) assert the applicant's actual innocence of the charged or uncharged conduct constituting an aggravating circumstance under section 9711(d) if the applicant's exoneration of the conduct would result in vacating a sentence of death; or(B) assert that the outcome of the DNA testing would establish a mitigating circumstance under section 9711(e)(7) if that mitigating circumstance was presented to the sentencing judge or jury and facts as to that issue were in dispute at the sentencing hearing.](3) present a prima facie case demonstrating that the:(i) identity of or the participation in the crime by the perpetrator was at issue in the proceedings that resulted in the applicant's conviction and sentencing; and(ii) DNA testing of the specific evidence, assuming exculpatory results, would establish:20250HB0888PN0960 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) the applicant's actual innocence of the offense for which the applicant was convicted;[(B) in a capital case, the applicant's actual innocence of the charged or uncharged conduct constituting an aggravating circumstance under section 9711(d) if the applicant's exoneration of the conduct would result in vacating a sentence of death; or(C) in a capital case, a mitigating circumstance under section 9711(e)(7) under the circumstances set forth in section 9711(c)(1)(iv).](d) Order.--* * *(2) The court shall not order the testing requested in a motion under subsection (a) if, after review of the record of the applicant's trial, the court determines that there is no reasonable possibility for an applicant under State supervision, or there is no reasonable probability for an applicant not under State supervision, or after review of the record of the applicant's guilty plea, the court determines that there is no reasonable probability, that the testing would produce exculpatory evidence that:(i) would establish the applicant's actual innocence of the offense for which the applicant was convicted;[(ii) in a capital case, would establish the applicant's actual innocence of the charged or uncharged conduct constituting an aggravating circumstance under section 9711(d) if the applicant's exoneration of the conduct would result in vacating a sentence of death; or(iii) in a capital case, would establish a 20250HB0888PN0960 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mitigating circumstance under section 9711(e)(7) under the circumstances set forth in section 9711(c)(1)(iv).]* * *§ 9577. Disposition and appeal.[(a) Capital unitary review.--Review by the Supreme Court under section 9711(h) (relating to review of death sentence) shall comprise direct appeal and collateral appeal. The common pleas court order disposing of the petition under this subchapter shall constitute the final judgment for purposes of this review.]* * *§ 9711. Sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree.[(a) Procedure in jury trials.--(1)] After a verdict of murder of the first degree is recorded [and before the jury is discharged], the court shall [conduct a separate sentencing hearing in which the jury shall determine whether the defendant shall be sentenced to death or] sentence the defendant to life imprisonment.[(2) In the sentencing hearing, evidence concerning the victim and the impact that the death of the victim has had on the family of the victim is admissible. Additionally, evidence may be presented as to any other matter that the court deems relevant and admissible on the question of the sentence to be imposed. Evidence shall include matters relating to any of the aggravating or mitigating circumstances specified in subsections (d) and (e), and information concerning the victim and the impact that the death of the victim has had on the family of the victim. Evidence of aggravating circumstances shall be limited to those circumstances specified in subsection (d).20250HB0888PN0960 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) After the presentation of evidence, the court shall permit counsel to present argument for or against the sentence of death. The court shall then instruct the jury in accordance with subsection (c).(4) Failure of the jury to unanimously agree upon a sentence shall not impeach or in any way affect the guilty verdict previously recorded.(b) Procedure in nonjury trials and guilty pleas.--If the defendant has waived a jury trial or pleaded guilty, the sentencing proceeding shall be conducted before a jury impaneled for that purpose unless waived by the defendant with the consent of the Commonwealth, in which case the trial judge shall hear the evidence and determine the penalty in the same manner as would a jury as provided in subsection (a).(c) Instructions to jury.--(1) Before the jury retires to consider the sentencing verdict, the court shall instruct the jury on the following matters:(i) The aggravating circumstances specified in subsection (d) as to which there is some evidence.(ii) The mitigating circumstances specified in subsection (e) as to which there is some evidence.(iii) Aggravating circumstances must be proved by the Commonwealth beyond a reasonable doubt; mitigating circumstances must be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the evidence.(iv) The verdict must be a sentence of death if the jury unanimously finds at least one aggravating circumstance specified in subsection (d) and no mitigating circumstance or if the jury unanimously finds 20250HB0888PN0960 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 one or more aggravating circumstances which outweigh any mitigating circumstances. The verdict must be a sentence of life imprisonment in all other cases.(v) The court may, in its discretion, discharge the jury if it is of the opinion that further deliberation will not result in a unanimous agreement as to the sentence, in which case the court shall sentence the defendant to life imprisonment.(2) The court shall instruct the jury that if it finds at least one aggravating circumstance and at least one mitigating circumstance, it shall consider, in weighing the aggravating and mitigating circumstances, any evidence presented about the victim and about the impact of the murder on the victim's family. The court shall also instruct the jury on any other matter that may be just and proper under the circumstances.(d) Aggravating circumstances.--Aggravating circumstances shall be limited to the following:(1) The victim was a firefighter, peace officer, public servant concerned in official detention, as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 5121 (relating to escape), judge of any court in the unified judicial system, the Attorney General of Pennsylvania, a deputy attorney general, district attorney, assistant district attorney, member of the General Assembly, Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Auditor General, State Treasurer, State law enforcement official, local law enforcement official, Federal law enforcement official or person employed to assist or assisting any law enforcement official in the performance of his duties, who was killed in the performance of his duties or as a result of his official 20250HB0888PN0960 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 position.(2) The defendant paid or was paid by another person or had contracted to pay or be paid by another person or had conspired to pay or be paid by another person for the killing of the victim.(3) The victim was being held by the defendant for ransom or reward, or as a shield or hostage.(4) The death of the victim occurred while defendant was engaged in the hijacking of an aircraft.(5) The victim was a prosecution witness to a murder or other felony committed by the defendant and was killed for the purpose of preventing his testimony against the defendant in any grand jury or criminal proceeding involving such offenses.(6) The defendant committed a killing while in the perpetration of a felony.(7) In the commission of the offense the defendant knowingly created a grave risk of death to another person in addition to the victim of the offense.(8) The offense was committed by means of torture.(9) The defendant has a significant history of felony convictions involving the use or threat of violence to the person.(10) The defendant has been convicted of another Federal or State offense, committed either before or at the time of the offense at issue, for which a sentence of life imprisonment or death was imposable or the defendant was undergoing a sentence of life imprisonment for any reason at the time of the commission of the offense.(11) The defendant has been convicted of another murder 20250HB0888PN0960 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 committed in any jurisdiction and committed either before or at the time of the offense at issue.(12) The defendant has been convicted of voluntary manslaughter, as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2503 (relating to voluntary manslaughter), or a substantially equivalent crime in any other jurisdiction, committed either before or at the time of the offense at issue.(13) The defendant committed the killing or was an accomplice in the killing, as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 306(c) (relating to liability for conduct of another; complicity), while in the perpetration of a felony under the provisions of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, and punishable under the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508 (relating to drug trafficking sentencing and penalties).(14) At the time of the killing, the victim was or had been involved, associated or in competition with the defendant in the sale, manufacture, distribution or delivery of any controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance in violation of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act or similar law of any other state, the District of Columbia or the United States, and the defendant committed the killing or was an accomplice to the killing as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 306(c), and the killing resulted from or was related to that association, involvement or competition to promote the defendant's activities in selling, manufacturing, distributing or delivering controlled substances or counterfeit controlled substances.(15) At the time of the killing, the victim was or had been a nongovernmental informant or had otherwise provided 20250HB0888PN0960 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any investigative, law enforcement or police agency with information concerning criminal activity and the defendant committed the killing or was an accomplice to the killing as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 306(c), and the killing was in retaliation for the victim's activities as a nongovernmental informant or in providing information concerning criminal activity to an investigative, law enforcement or police agency.(16) The victim was a child under 12 years of age.(17) At the time of the killing, the victim was in her third trimester of pregnancy or the defendant had knowledge of the victim's pregnancy.(18) At the time of the killing the defendant was subject to a court order restricting in any way the defendant's behavior toward the victim pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse) or any other order of a court of common pleas or of the minor judiciary designed in whole or in part to protect the victim from the defendant.(e) Mitigating circumstances.--Mitigating circumstances shall include the following:(1) The defendant has no significant history of prior criminal convictions.(2) The defendant was under the influence of extreme mental or emotional disturbance.(3) The capacity of the defendant to appreciate the criminality of his conduct or to conform his conduct to the requirements of law was substantially impaired.(4) The age of the defendant at the time of the crime.(5) The defendant acted under extreme duress, although not such duress as to constitute a defense to prosecution 20250HB0888PN0960 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under 18 Pa.C.S. § 309 (relating to duress), or acted under the substantial domination of another person.(6) The victim was a participant in the defendant's homicidal conduct or consented to the homicidal acts.(7) The defendant's participation in the homicidal act was relatively minor.(8) Any other evidence of mitigation concerning the character and record of the defendant and the circumstances of his offense.(f) Sentencing verdict by the jury.--(1) After hearing all the evidence and receiving the instructions from the court, the jury shall deliberate and render a sentencing verdict. In rendering the verdict, if the sentence is death, the jury shall set forth in such form as designated by the court the findings upon which the sentence is based.(2) Based upon these findings, the jury shall set forth in writing whether the sentence is death or life imprisonment.(g) Recording sentencing verdict.--Whenever the jury shall agree upon a sentencing verdict, it shall be received and recorded by the court. The court shall thereafter impose upon the defendant the sentence fixed by the jury.(h) Review of death sentence.--(1) A sentence of death shall be subject to automatic review by the Supreme Court of Pennsylvania pursuant to its rules.(2) In addition to its authority to correct errors at trial, the Supreme Court shall either affirm the sentence of death or vacate the sentence of death and remand for further 20250HB0888PN0960 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proceedings as provided in paragraph (4).(3) The Supreme Court shall affirm the sentence of death unless it determines that:(i) the sentence of death was the product of passion, prejudice or any other arbitrary factor; or(ii) the evidence fails to support the finding of at least one aggravating circumstance specified in subsection (d).(4) If the Supreme Court determines that the death penalty must be vacated because none of the aggravating circumstances are supported by sufficient evidence, then it shall remand for the imposition of a life imprisonment sentence. If the Supreme Court determines that the death penalty must be vacated for any other reason, it shall remand for a new sentencing hearing pursuant to subsections (a) through (g).(i) Record of death sentence to Governor.--Where a sentence of death is upheld by the Supreme Court, the prothonotary of the Supreme Court shall transmit to the Governor a full and complete record of the trial, sentencing hearing, imposition of sentence, opinion and order by the Supreme Court within 30 days of one of the following, whichever occurs first:(1) the expiration of the time period for filing a petition for writ of certiorari or extension thereof where neither has been filed;(2) the denial of a petition for writ of certiorari; or(3) the disposition of the appeal by the United States Supreme Court, if that court grants the petition for writ of certiorari.Notice of this transmission shall contemporaneously be provided 20250HB0888PN0960 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the Secretary of Corrections.]Section 3. Section 4302 of Title 61 is repealed:[§ 4302. Issuance of warrant.(a) Time.--(1) After the receipt of the record pursuant to 42 Pa.C.S. § 9711(i) (relating to sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree), unless a pardon or commutation has been issued, the Governor shall, within 90 days, issue a warrant specifying a day for execution which shall be no later than 60 days after the date the warrant is signed.(2) If, because of a reprieve or a judicial stay of the execution, the date of execution passes without imposition of the death penalty, unless a pardon or commutation has been issued, the Governor shall, within 30 days after receiving notice of the termination of the reprieve or the judicial stay, reissue a warrant specifying a day for execution which shall be no later than 60 days after the date of reissuance of the warrant.(b) Secretary.--The warrant shall be directed to the secretary commanding that the subject of the warrant be executed on the day named in the warrant and in the manner prescribed by law.(c) Failure to timely comply.--If the Governor fails to timely comply with the provisions of this section and a pardon or commutation has not been issued, the secretary shall, within 30 days following the Governor's failure to comply, schedule and carry out the execution no later than 60 days from the date by which the Governor was required to sign the warrant under subsection (a).]Section 4. This act shall apply to defendants and 20250HB0888PN0960 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individuals who have not been sentenced as of the effective date of this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0888PN0960 - 15 - 123